Georgia, session 2025_26, SB225.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Article 1 of Chapter 1 of Title 20 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to
general provisions relative to education, is amended by adding a new Code section to read
as follows:
"20-1-12.
(a) As used in this Code section, the term:
(1) 'Discrimination' means any direct or indirect act or practice of exclusion, distinction,
restriction, segregation, limitation, refusal, or denial or any other act or practice of
S. B. 225
- 1 -

LC 61 0115ER
differentiation or preference in the treatment of a person or persons because of race,
color, religion, national origin, sex, handicap, or age or the aiding, abetting, inciting,
coercing or compelling of such an act or practice. This term shall not include any direct
or indirect act or practice of exclusion, distinction, restriction, segregation, limitation,
refusal, or denial or any other act or practice of differentiation or preference in the
treatment of a person or persons because of religion if an educational institution
demonstrates that it is unable to accommodate reasonably an individual's religious
observance or practice without undue hardship on the conduct of the educational
institution's operation.
(2) 'Educational institution' shall have the same meaning as set forth in Code
Section 20-1-10.
(3) 'Protective hairstyle' means braids, locs, twists, afro, or other textured hairdressing
associated with an individual's race, color, or national origin.
(4) 'Race' includes traits associated with race, color, or national origin, including, but not
limited to, hair texture and protective hairstyles.
(b) No individual shall be subjected to discrimination on the basis of such individual's race
due to a protective hairstyle, or length thereof, in any student dress or grooming policy,
program, or activity conducted by an educational institution that receives or benefits from
state financial assistance, or enrolls students who receive state student financial aid."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 225
- 2 -